Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 7

Employee and Server Permits

57-3-701. Short title.

This part shall be known as the “Alcohol Server Responsibility and Training Act of 1995.”

Acts 1995, ch. 396, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 396, § 9 provided that persons holding a valid employee or salesperson permit issued by the commission need not obtain a new permit hereunder until the expiration of the existing permits.

Law Reviews.

One Too Many: Sellers, Servers Must Know “How Much Is Too Much” to Avoid Alcohol Related Injuries (Mike Faulk), 43 Tenn. B.J. 12 (2007).

57-3-702. Commission authorized to issue permits.

The commission is authorized to issue employee permits pursuant to §§57-3-203(d),57-3-203(e), [former]57-3-204(c) and server permits pursuant to §57-4-203(h) in accordance with the requirements of this part.

Acts 1995, ch. 396, § 1; 2014, ch. 973, § 3; 2017, ch. 373, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Section 57-3-204(c), referred to in this section, expired effective July 1, 2016.

57-3-703. Application requirements for employee permit.

Any individual may be eligible for an employee permit by completing an application for such a permit on the forms provided by the commission. An applicant for an employee permit must demonstrate to the commission that the applicant is at least eighteen (18) years of age and:

Has not been convicted of a felony offense involving theft, dishonesty, deceit, or intoxication within the previous eight (8) years;

Has not been convicted of any crime involving the sale or distribution of alcoholic beverages or beer, Schedules I and II controlled substances, or controlled substance analogues or any sex-related crime or embezzlement within the previous eight (8) years;

Has not had an employee permit or any similar permit issued by the state, any local jurisdiction, or any foreign jurisdiction revoked by any issuing authority within the previous five (5) years; and

Has not had an ownership interest in any licensee or permittee, licensed or permitted pursuant to § 57-3-203, § 57-3-204, § 57-3-207, § 57-4-101 or § 57-5-103 which has had its license or permit revoked by the issuing authority within the previous eight (8) years.

If an applicant does not meet the requirements of subdivisions (a)(1)-(4), but is otherwise eligible for a permit, then the applicant's application shall be initially denied pursuant to this subsection (b). Within thirty (30) days of such initial denial, the applicant may request a hearing to be held pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. At such hearing, the administrative law judge or hearing officer may consider any evidence the administrative law judge or hearing officer deems relevant to the matter and may, if in the administrative law judge's or hearing officer's judgment the principles of equity require, approve the application and grant the employee permit, notwithstanding the requirements of subdivisions (a)(1)-(4).

If an applicant does not request a hearing pursuant to subsection (b) within the required period, then the application's denial will be final and the applicant may not reapply for an employee permit until the relevant time period described in subdivisions (a)(1)-(4) has expired. If a person applies for an employee permit in violation of this subdivision (c)(1), then such application shall be denied and subsection (b) shall not apply.

If the administrative law judge, hearing officer, or commission denies an application at a hearing held pursuant to subsection (b), then the application's denial will be final and the applicant may not reapply for an employee permit or apply for a server permit pursuant to § 57-3-704 until the relevant time period described in subdivision (a)(1)-(4) has expired. If a person applies for an employee or server permit in violation of this subdivision (c)(2), then such application shall be denied and subsection (b) or § 57-3-704(b) shall not apply.

If a person is convicted of an offense described in subdivision (a)(1) or (a)(2) after being issued an employee permit pursuant to this section, the commission may institute proceedings to revoke the person's employee permit pursuant to § 57-3-214; provided, that the administrative law judge or hearing officer may, if in the administrative law judge's or hearing officer's judgment the principles of equity require, refuse to revoke the person's employee permit, notwithstanding a finding that the person has been convicted of an offense described in subdivision (a)(1) or (a)(2). If the administrative law judge, hearing officer, or commission revokes an employee permit pursuant to this subsection (d), then the applicant may not reapply for an employee permit or apply for a server permit pursuant to § 57-3-704 until the relevant time period described in subdivision (a)(1) or (a)(2) has expired. If a person applies for an employee or server permit in violation of this subsection (d), then such application shall be denied and subsection (b) or § 57-3-704(b) shall not apply.

The commission may promulgate rules and regulations to enforce and administer this section pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

Acts 1995, ch. 396, § 1; 2014, ch. 973, § 1; 2016, ch. 719, § 1; 2017, ch. 147, § 12.

Complier's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 719, § 11 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall take effect on April 6, 2016 and shall apply to actions instituted by state entities on or after April 6, 2016.

57-3-704. Application requirements for server permits.

Any individual may be eligible for a server permit by completing an application for such a permit on the forms provided by the commission. An applicant for a server permit must demonstrate to the commission that the applicant meets the following requirements:

Within one (1) year prior to the submission of the application the applicant has successfully completed a program of alcohol awareness training for persons involved in the direct service of alcohol, wine or beer by an entity certified by the commission to have an adequate training curriculum for alcohol awareness. The training program must consist of not less than three and one-half (3½) hours of alcohol awareness training. If, in the determination of the commission, a state other than Tennessee is deemed to have an adequate program of alcohol awareness training, then the successful completion of such training in that state within one (1) year prior to the submission of an application to the commission for a server permit shall satisfy the requirement of alcohol awareness training;

The applicant is at least eighteen (18) years of age; and

The applicant:

Has not been convicted of a felony offense involving theft, dishonesty, deceit, or intoxication within the previous eight (8) years;

Has not been convicted of any crime relating to the sale or dispensing of alcoholic beverages or beer, Schedules I and II controlled substances, or controlled substance analogues or any sex-related crime or embezzlement within the previous eight (8) years;

Has not had a server permit or any similar permit issued by the state, any local jurisdiction, or any foreign jurisdiction revoked by any issuing authority within the previous five (5) years; and

Has not had an ownership interest in any licensee or permittee, licensed or permitted pursuant to § 57-3-203, § 57-3-204, § 57-3-207, § 57-4-101 or § 57-5-103 which has had its license or permit revoked by the issuing authority within the previous eight (8) years.

If an applicant does not meet the requirements of subdivision (a)(3), but is otherwise eligible for a server permit, then the applicant's application shall be initially denied pursuant to this subsection (b). Within thirty (30) days of such initial denial, the applicant may request a hearing to be held pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. At such hearing, the administrative law judge or hearing officer may consider any evidence the administrative law judge or hearing officer deems relevant to the matter and may, if in the administrative law judge's or hearing officer's judgment the principles of equity require, approve the application and grant the employee permit, notwithstanding the requirements of subdivision (a)(3).

If an applicant does not request a hearing pursuant to subsection (b) within the required period, then the application's denial will be final and the applicant may not reapply for a server permit until the relevant time period described in subdivision (a)(3) has expired. If a person applies for a server permit in violation of this subdivision (c)(1), then such application shall be denied and subsection (b) shall not apply.

If the administrative law judge, hearing officer, or commission denies an application pursuant to subsection (b), then the application's denial will be final and the applicant may not reapply for a server permit or apply for an employee permit pursuant to § 57-3-703 until the relevant time period described in subdivision (a)(3) has expired. If a person applies for an employee or server permit in violation of this subdivision (c)(2), then such application shall be denied and subsection (b) or § 57-3-703(b) shall not apply.

If a person is convicted of an offense described in subdivision (a)(3)(A) or (a)(3)(B) after being issued a server permit pursuant to this section, the commission may institute proceedings to revoke the person's server permit pursuant to § 57-3-214; provided, that the administrative law judge or hearing officer may, if in the administrative law judge's or hearing officer's judgment the principles of equity require, refuse to revoke the person's server permit, notwithstanding a finding that the person has been convicted of an offense described in subdivision (a)(3)(A) or (a)(3)(B). If the administrative law judge, hearing officer, or commission revokes a server permit pursuant to this subsection (d), then the applicant may not reapply for a server permit or apply for an employee permit pursuant to § 57-3-703 until the relevant time period described in subdivision (a)(3)(A) or (a)(3)(B) has expired. If a person applies for an employee or server permit in violation of this subsection (d), then such application shall be denied and subsection (b) or § 57-3-703(b) shall not apply.

The commission may promulgate rules and regulations to enforce and administer this section pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

The commission may suspend or revoke a server permit for any violation of this title or any rule or regulation promulgated by the commission committed by the permit holder. The commission may, in lieu of suspending or revoking a server permit under this subsection (f), require the server to retake and successfully complete a program of alcohol awareness training conducted by an entity certified by the commission.

Any employee, representative, or agent of a permittee whose duties include verifying that a person is twenty-one (21) years of age or older for the purpose of authorizing the person access to the premises of the permittee shall, during any period in which the employee, representative, or agent is required to verify that a person is twenty-one (21) years of age or older, require each person seeking access to the premises whose physical appearance does not reasonably demonstrate an age of fifty (50) years or older to present a valid, government-issued document or other acceptable form of identification that includes the photograph and birth date of the person.

The commission may impose a fine of five hundred dollars ($500) against any employee, representative, or agent of a permittee who violates subdivision (g)(1).

As used in this subsection (g):

“Employee, representative, or agent” does not include a server permitted under § 57-4-203(h) and this part; and

“Permittee” means any person, business, or other entity issued a permit under chapter 4 of this title for the purpose of authorizing the sale and consumption of alcoholic beverages on the premises of the permittee.

Acts 1995, ch. 396, § 1; 2001, ch. 279, § 2; 2012, ch. 848, § 60; 2012, ch. 1063, § 2; 2014, ch. 973, § 2; 2016, ch. 719, § 2; 2016, ch. 908, § 2; 2017, ch. 147, § 13; 2019, ch. 435, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 719, § 11 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall take effect on April 6, 2016, and shall apply to actions instituted by state entities on or after April 6, 2016.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added the second sentence in (a)(1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 435, § 6. May 22, 2019.

Attorney General Opinions. Neither this section nor the statute authorizing the Alcoholic Beverage Commission to promulgate rules, T.C.A. §57-3-710, authorizes the commission to promulgate a rule that would allow it to grant a server permit and immediately suspend it for a specific length of time, OAG 04-021 (2/09/04).

57-3-705. Commission certification.

The commission shall certify any organization or entity seeking to provide alcohol awareness training for employees or servers, or both, upon adequate demonstration to the commission that the curriculum, faculty, materials and facilities of the organization or entity meet such minimum standards as shall be fixed by the commission. The commission is authorized to review the adequacy of the curriculum, faculty, materials and facilities of any certified trainer at any time. Failure of any certified trainer to maintain adequate records, respond to a request for information from the commission, or meet the minimum standards prescribed by the commission shall be grounds to decertify the organization or entity. The commission may certify any online training programs that meet the minimum standards as set by the commission.

Acts 1995, ch. 396, § 1; 2017, ch. 338, § 3.

57-3-706. Criminal record check.

The commission may conduct a criminal record review of any applicant for an employee or server permit to ensure the applicant's compliance with the requirements of this part. The commission shall employ the best available means to conduct this investigation.

Acts 1995, ch. 396, § 1.

57-3-707. Temporary permits — Replacement permit cards — Property of employee.

A new server may work for sixty-one (61) days after being hired without the permit required by this part. Any server who has worked for sixty-one (61) days must have the permit required by this part. Upon payment of a reasonable copying fee, the alcoholic beverage commission is authorized and directed to issue replacement permit cards to any cardholder who is qualified under this part for an employee or server permit card which is still valid. Employee and server permit cards are hereby declared the property of the employee or server to whom such cards have been issued. Licensed establishments shall only require a server or employee to provide a copy of such cards for keeping by the establishment.

Acts 1995, ch. 396, § 1; 1999, ch. 206, § 1; 2001, ch. 279, § 1; 2002, ch. 716, § 1.

57-3-708. Permit renewal.

Each employee and server permit shall be valid for five (5) years. Applications for renewal shall be made in the same manner as applications for original permits upon forms prescribed by the commission. Employee and server permits are not transferrable.

Acts 1995, ch. 396, § 1; 2001, ch. 279, § 3.

57-3-709. Fees.

The commission may assess an application and renewal fee for the permits to be issued under this part. The commission may assess a certification fee to any organization or entity seeking certification under §57-3-705. The commission shall establish such fees, only pursuant to rules promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, and such fees shall be limited only to covering the costs of implementing this part and for the implementation and updating of commission information technology and software. The commission shall assess an application and renewal fee for the permits issued under this part in an amount sufficient to fund any cost to the state which results from loss of federal funds to implement and administer this program.

Acts 1995, ch. 396, § 1; 2015, ch. 425, § 2.

57-3-710. Implementation.

The commission is authorized to promulgate appropriate rules to implement this part.

Acts 1995, ch. 396, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Neither this section nor the statute governing server issuance and denial of server permits, T.C.A. §57-3-704, authorizes the Alcoholic Beverage Commission to promulgate a rule that would allow the commission to grant a server permit and immediately suspend it for a specific length of time, OAG 04-021 (2/09/04).